src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-juqrdded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - juʹrdded: # Verb 'to think, to consider' - full paradigm
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joordam
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: joordak
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jordd
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juʹrddep
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juʹrddveʹted
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joʹrdde
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: juuʹrdet
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: juuʹrd
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juʹrddem
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juʹrddiǩ
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juuʹrdi
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [juuʹrdim, juuʹrdin]
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juuʹrdid
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juʹrdde
     juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: juʹrddeš 
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Sg1: juuʹrdžem
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Sg2: juuʹrdžiǩ
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Sg3: juuʹrdež
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [juuʹrdžep, juuʹrdžim, juuʹrdžin]
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Pl2: juuʹrdžid
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Pl3: juuʹrdže
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+Sg4: juuʹrdžet
     juʹrdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: juuʹrdže
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg2: [joordčiǩ, joordčeǩ]
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg3: joordči
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [joordčim, joordčin, joordčep]
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Pl2: joordčid
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Pl3: joordče
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg4: joordčeš
     juʹrdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: joordče
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+Sg2: juuʹrd
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+Sg3: joordas
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+Pl1: juʹrddep
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+Pl2: juʹrdded
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+Pl3: jorddaz
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+ConNeg: juuʹrd
     juʹrdded+V+Imprt+ConNegII: jurddu
     juʹrdded+V+Actio: juʹrddem
     juʹrdded+V+Actio+Ess: juʹrddmen
     juʹrdded+V+Act+PrsPrc: juʹrddi
     juʹrdded+V+Act+PrfPrc: jorddam
     juʹrdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: jurddum
     juʹrdded+V+VAbess: [juuʹrdkâni, juuʹrdkani, juuʹrdǩeânai, juuʹrdǩani, juuʹrdǩâni, juuʹrdǩenai, juuʹrdǩeânnai, juuʹrdǩânai]
     juʹrdded+V+Ger+Ess: juuʹrdeeʹn
     juʹrdded+V+Ger+Instr: juuʹrdeeʹl
